Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-124
Undervalued and overvalued property, defined.

Undervalued and overvalued property means any taxable real property that is assessed by the county assessor but has a taxable value lower or higher than other taxable property with which it is required to be equalized.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 7.